Utah statutes.
77-32-308.   Pro bono criminal representation -- Liability limits.
Counsel assigned by a court to represent an indigent in criminal, post-
conviction, or habeas corpus proceedings is immune from suit if the attorney
provides the legal services:
(1)  at no cost; or
(2)  for only a substantially reduced cost that is applied to, but does not
cover, expenses of the service; and
(3)  without gross negligence or willful misconduct.
